Hawaii statutes.
§324-32 Release of information. (a)
Consistent with section 324-31 and Public Law 93-380, the department of health
may, if not otherwise prohibited by law release statistical records or
information relating to the health surveillance program. The materials
collected under this part shall only be used for the analysis of health,
demographic, socio-economic, environmental and related factors for the
evaluation of health problems, health programs, delivery and utilization of
medical care, analysis and interpretation of public health trends, forecasting
long and short range public health needs and for the determination of programs
to meet such needs.

(b) The department of health may collect
additional information requested by other public or private agencies and may
release statistical information from the health surveillance program for
research, educational or program purposes to the public or private agencies or
individuals. [L 1977, c 117, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next